Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,225
Tort Claims Fund; established; amount; investment; appropriation.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a Tort Claims Fund from which awards, judgments, and associated costs under the State Tort Claims Act may be paid, including appeal bonds or the reasonable costs associated with a required appearance before any tribunal. This fund shall be in such amount as the Legislature determines to be reasonably sufficient to meet anticipated claims. When the amount of money in the fund is not sufficient to pay any awards or judgments under such act, the Risk Manager shall immediately advise the Legislature and request an emergency appropriation to satisfy such awards and judgments. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 17, p. 2850;

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 36;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 111;

Laws 2005, LB 485, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.